src/verbs.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Sg +Pl +V +1p +2p +3p +Pres +Past +Ind +Inf +Imp +Part +Passive

LEXICON Root
Verbs;

LEXICON Verbs

anar	arVerb;
cantar	arVerb;
estar	arVerb;
parlar	arVerb;

haver	erVerb;
poder	erVerb;
saber	erVerb;
soler	erVerb;
valer	erVerb;
voler	erVerb;

córrer	erVerb;
créixer	erVerb;
tòrcer	erVerb;

caure	reVerb;
perdre	reVerb;
vendre	reVerb;

dir		otherVerb;
dur		otherVerb;
fer		otherVerb;

dormir	irVerb;
sentir	irVerb;
venir	irVerb;

servir	irVerb;
eixir	irVerb;



LEXICON arVerb

+V+Pres+Inf:0					#;
+V+ar+Pres+Gerund:^ant			#;
+V+ar+Past+Passive+Part:^at 	#;
+V+ar+Past+Passive+Part:^ada	#;
+V+ar+Pres+1p+Sg+Ind:^o			#;
+V+ar+Pres+2p+Sg+Ind:^es 		#;
+V+ar+Pres+3p+Sg+Ind:^a 		#;
+V+ar+Pres+1p+Pl+Ind:^em		#;
+V+ar+Pres+2p+Pl+Ind:^eu 		#;
+V+ar+Pres+3p+Pl+Ind:^en		#;
+V+ar+Imp+1p+Sg+Ind:^ava 		#;
+V+ar+Imp+2p+Sg+Ind:^aves 		#;
+V+ar+Imp+3p+Sg+Ind:^ava 		#;
+V+ar+Imp+1p+Pl+Ind:^ávem		#;
+V+ar+Imp+2p+Pl+Ind:^áveu 		#;
+V+ar+Imp+3p+Pl+Ind:^aven 		#;



LEXICON erVerb

+V+Pres+Inf:0					#;
+V+er+Pres+Gerund:^ent			#;
+V+er+Past+Passive+Part:^ut 	#;
+V+er+Past+Passive+Part:^uda 	#;
+V+er+Pres+1p+Sg+Ind:^o 		#;
+V+er+Pres+2p+Sg+Ind:^s 		#;
+V+er+Pres+3p+Sg+Ind:0			#;
+V+er+Pres+1p+Pl+Ind:^em		#;
+V+er+Pres+2p+Pl+Ind:^eu		#;
+V+er+Pres+3p+Pl+Ind:^en		#;
+V+er+Imp+1p+Sg+Ind:^ia 		#;
+V+er+Imp+2p+Sg+Ind:^ies 		#;
+V+er+Imp+3p+Sg+Ind:^ia 		#;
+V+er+Imp+1p+Pl+Ind:^íem 		#;
+V+er+Imp+2p+Pl+Ind:^íeu 		#;
+V+er+Imp+3p+Pl+Ind:^ien 		#;

LEXICON reVerb

+V+Pres+Inf:0					#;
+V+re+Pres+Gerund:^ent			#;
+V+re+Past+Passive+Part:^ut 	#;
+V+re+Past+Passive+Part:^uda 	#;
+V+er+Pres+1p+Sg+Ind:^o 		#;
+V+er+Pres+2p+Sg+Ind:^s 		#;
+V+er+Pres+3p+Sg+Ind:0			#;
+V+er+Pres+1p+Pl+Ind:^em		#;
+V+er+Pres+2p+Pl+Ind:^eu		#;
+V+er+Pres+3p+Pl+Ind:^en		#;
+V+er+Imp+1p+Sg+Ind:^ia 		#;
+V+er+Imp+2p+Sg+Ind:^ies 		#;
+V+er+Imp+3p+Sg+Ind:^ia 		#;
+V+er+Imp+1p+Pl+Ind:^íem 		#;
+V+er+Imp+2p+Pl+Ind:^íeu 		#;
+V+er+Imp+3p+Pl+Ind:^ien 		#;


LEXICON irVerb

+V+Pres+Inf:0					#;
+V+ir+Pres+Gerund:^int			#;
+V+ir+Past+Passive+Part:^it 	#;
+V+ir+Past+Passive+Part:^ida 	#;



LEXICON otherVerb

+V+Pres+Inf:0					#;
